Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-251
Pupils; health inspections; duty of school board.

The boards of education and school boards of the school districts of the state shall enforce the provisions of sections 79-248 to 79-253.

Laws 1919, c. 241, § 4, p. 1004;

C.S.1922, § 6539;

C.S.1929, § 79-2116;

R.S.1943, § 79-2125;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 174, p. 749;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,136;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 55.